Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7433
Common control, defined.

Common control means that the power to direct or cause the direction of the management and policies of a person or an organization by ownership of stock or voting rights, by contract, or otherwise is held by the same person or persons.

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 6;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-7406;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 7.